fr: Forme des morceaux de fruits: Haché/émincé; En dés/gros morceaux; Coupé en deux; Morceaux mélangés; Entier dénoyauté; En poudre; En rondelles; En rouleau/feuille; En tranches; En lanières; Entier; Entier avec noyau; Autre
zh-CN: 水果块状: 切碎/剁碎; 切丁/大块; 切半; 混合果块; 去核整果; 粉状; 环状; 卷状/片状; 切片; 条形; 整个; 带核整果; 其他
zh-TW: 水果片塊形式: 切碎/絞碎; 切丁/大塊; 切半; 混合塊; 去核完整; 粉狀; 圈狀; 捲狀/片狀; 切片; 條狀; 完整; 帶核完整; 其他
vi: Hình dạng miếng trái cây: Băm/xay nhỏ; Cắt hạt lựu/cắt khúc; Cắt đôi; Cắt kiểu hỗn hợp; Nguyên trái bỏ hạt; Dạng bột; Khoanh tròn; Dạng cuộn/lá; Cắt lát; Cắt dải; Nguyên trái; Nguyên trái có hạt; Khác
ru: Форма фруктовых кусочков: Измельченные/рубленые; Кубики/кусочки; Половинки; Смесь кусочков; Целые без косточек; Порошок; Кольца; Рулет/лист; Ломтики; Полоски; Целые; Целые с косточкой; Другое
pt-BR: Formato dos pedaço das frutas: Picado/triturado; Em cubos/pedaços; Cortado ao meio; Pedaços mistos; Inteiro sem caroço; Em pó; Em anéis; Rolo/folha; Fatiado; Em tiras; Inteiro; Inteiro com caroço; Outro
nl: Fruitstuk vorm: Gehakt/fijngesneden; In blokjes/stukjes; Gehalveerd; Gemengde stukjes; Heel, ontpit; In poedervorm; Ringen; Rol/vel; In plakjes; Reepjes; Heel; Heel met pit; Anders
de: Form der Fruchtstücke: Gehackt/zerkleinert; Gewürfelt/in Stücken; Halbiert; Gemischte Stücke; Ganz, entkernt; Pulverisiert; Ringe; Rolle/Platte; In Scheiben; Streifen; Ganz; Ganz mit Kern; Sonstige
bg-BG: Форма на парчетата плод: Нарязани/наситнени; На кубчета/едри парчета; На половинки; Смесени парчета; Цели без костилка; На прах; На кръгчета; Ролка/лист; На резени; На лентички; Цели; Цели с костилка; Друго
lt-LT: Vaisių gabalėlių forma: Pjaustyta / malta; Kubeliais / gabalėliais; Pusėmis; Skirtingi gabalėliai; Visas be kauliuko; Milteliai; Žiedai; Vyniotinis / lakštas; Griežinėliais; Juostelės; Visas; Visas su kauliuku; Kita
tr: Meyve parça formu: Doğranmış/kıyılmış; Küp küp/iri parçalı; İkiye bölünmüş; Karışık parçalı; Çekirdeği çıkarılmış bütün; Toz halinde; Halka; Rulo/yaprak; Dilimlenmiş; Şerit; Bütün; Çekirdekli bütün; Diğer
el: Μορφή κομματιού φρούτων: Ψιλοκομμένα/αλεσμένα; Σε κύβους/κομμάτια; Στη μέση; Ανάμεικτα κομμάτια; Ολόκληρα χωρίς κουκούτσι; Σε σκόνη; Ροδέλες; Ρολό/φύλλο; Σε φέτες; Λωρίδες; Ολόκληρα; Ολόκληρα με κουκούτσι; Άλλο
hu: Gyümölcsdarab formája: Aprított/darált; Kockázott/darabos; Felezett; Vegyes darabok; Magozott egész; Porított; Karika; Tekercs/lap; Szeletelt; Csíkozott; Egész; Egész maggal; Egyéb
th: รูปทรงชิ้นผลไม้: สับ/สับละเอียด; หั่นเต๋า/หั่นชิ้นใหญ่; ผ่าครึ่ง; ชิ้นแบบผสม; ทั้งผลแบบคว้านเมล็ดออก; ผง; หั่นแว่น; แบบม้วน/แผ่น; สไลซ์; หั่นเส้น; ทั้งผล; ทั้งผลแบบมีเมล็ด; อื่นๆ
fi: Hedelmäpalan muoto: Hienonnettu/pilkottu; Kuutioitu/palat; Puolitettu; Sekalaiset palat; Kivetön kokonainen; Jauhettu; Renkaat; Rulla/levy; Viipaloitu; Suikaleet; Kokonainen; Kokonainen, kivellinen; Muu
es: Forma de trozo de fruta: Picado/desmenuzado; En cubitos/trozos; A la mitad; Trozos mixtos; Entero deshuesado; En polvo; Anillos; Rollo/lámina; En rebanadas; Tiras; Entero; Entero con hueso; Otro
cs: Forma kousků ovoce: Sekané/mleté; Kostky/kousky; Půlené; Směs kousků; Celé odpeckované; Prášek; Kroužky; Role/plátek; Plátky; Proužky; Celé; Celé s peckou; Ostatní
pt-PT: formato de peça de fruta: Picado; Em cubos/pedaços; Em metades; Pedaços mistos; Inteiro descaroçado; Em pó; Rodelas; Rolo/folha; Fatiado; Tiras; Inteiro; Inteiro com caroço; Outro
ro-RO: Formă de bucată de fruct: Tocat/mărunțit; Cubulețe/bucăți; Jumătăți; Bucăți asortate; Întreg fără sâmburi; Pudră; Inele; Rulou/foaie; Feliat; Fâșii; Întreg; Întreg cu sâmbure; Altele
sk-SK: Tvar kúska ovocia: Nasekané/mleté; Na kocky/kusy; Na polovice; Zmes kúskov; Celé bez kôstok; V prášku; Krúžky; Rolky/plátky; Na plátky; Pásiky; Celé; Celé s kôstkou; Iné
it: Forma del pezzo di frutta: Tritata/sminuzzata; A cubetti/tocchetti; A metà; Pezzi misti; Intera denocciolata; In polvere; Ad anelli; Rotolo/sfoglia; A fette; A strisce; Intera; Intera con nocciolo; Altro
ko: 과일 조각 형태: 다진 형태; 깍둑썰기/청크; 2등분; 혼합 조각; 씨를 뺀 통과일; 분말형; 링형; 롤/시트형; 슬라이스; 스트립형; 통과일; 씨가 있는 통과일; 기타
sv: Form på fruktbitar: Hackad/finhackad; Tärnad/i bitar; Halverad; Blandade bitar; Urkärnad hel; Pulveriserad; Ringar; Rulle/ark; Skivad; Strimlor; Hel; Hel med kärna; Övrigt
hr-HR: Oblik voćnih komada: Usitnjeno / sitno nasjeckano; Kockice / veći komadi; Prepolovljeno; Različiti komadići; Cijelo bez koštice; U prahu; Kolutići; Rolice/listići; Narezano na ploške; Trakice; Cijelo; Cijelo s košticom; Ostalo
pl: Forma kawałka owocu: Posiekane/zmielone; Pokrojone w kostkę/kawałki; Połówki; Mieszane kawałki; W całości bez pestek; W proszku; Krążki; Rolka/arkusz; W plastrach; Paski; W całości; W całości z pestką; Inna
nb: Fruktstykkeform: Hakket/finhakket; Terninger/biter; Halvert; Blandede biter; Hel og utsteinet; Pulverisert; Ringer; Rull/flak; Skivet; Strimler; Hel; Hel med stein; Annet
da: Frugtstykkers form: Hakket/finthakket; I tern/stykker; Halveret; Blandede stykker; Hel uden sten; Pulveriseret; Ringe; Rulle/plade; I skiver; Strimler; Hel; Hel med sten; Andet
sl-SI: Oblika sadnega kosa: Sesekljano/zmleto; Narezano na kocke/kose; Razpolovljeno; Mešani kosi; Celo, brez koščic; V prahu; Obročki; Zvitek/list; Narezano; Trakovi; Celo; Celo s koščico; Drugo
en: Fruit piece form: Chopped/minced; Diced/chunks; Halved; Mixed pieces; Pitted whole; Powdered; Rings; Roll/sheet; Sliced; Strips; Whole; Whole with pit; Other
ja: フルーツピースの形: みじん切り/ミンチ; ダイス/チャンク; ハーフ; ミックス; 種抜きホール; パウダー; リング; ロール/シート; スライス; ストリップ; ホール; 種付きホール; その他